Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0870.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of labor
and economic opportunity for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2027, from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 34.5
Full-time equated classified positions 2,606.0
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,667,344,800
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATIONS $ 1,667,344,800
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 1,190,870,600
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 10,700,000
Total private revenues 12,597,200
Total other state restricted revenues 237,782,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 215,394,900
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 34.5
Full-time equated classified positions 75.0
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 34.5 $ 5,015,500
Executive direction and operations--FTEs 75.0 10,975,600
Property management 7,458,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,449,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DED, vocational rehabilitation and independent
living 3,654,500
DOL, federal funds 3,272,900
DOL-ETA, unemployment insurance 2,705,800
DOL, occupational safety and health 586,700
Federal funds 2,584,700
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Special revenue funds:
Asbestos abatement fund 52,800
Corporation fees 2,277,900
Michigan state housing development authority
fees and charges 681,200
Private occupational school license fees 56,200
Radiological health fees 299,600
Safety education and training fund 1,100,000
Second injury fund 281,000
Securities fees 2,256,200
Self-insurers security fund 152,700
Silicosis and dust disease fund 116,100
Worker's compensation administrative revolving
fund 93,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,277,100
Sec. 103. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
Full-time equated classified positions 239.0
23+ high school diploma program $ 2,000,000
At-risk youth grants 5,184,500
Community and worker economic transition
office--FTEs 10.0 2,252,600
High school equivalency-to-school program 250,000
Michigan office of rural prosperity--FTE 1.0 2,302,100
MiSTEM advisory council--FTEs 3.0 674,600
Office of future mobility and electrification--
FTEs 5.0 1,500,000
Workforce development--FTEs 220.0 450,078,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 464,242,600
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DAG, employment and training 4,560,400
DED-OESE, GEAR-UP 5,500,000
DED-OVAE, adult education 20,000,000
DED-OVAE, basic grants to states 19,000,000
DOL-ETA, workforce investment act 173,488,600
DOL, federal funds 106,329,800
Federal funds 23,225,100
Social security act, temporary assistance to
needy families 63,698,800
Special revenue funds:
Local revenues 300,000
Private funds 5,001,300
Contingent fund, penalty and interest 5,017,500
Defaulted loan collection 168,600
HR-1 costs fund 15,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 22,952,500
Sec. 104. REHABILITATION SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 669.0
Bureau of services for blind persons--FTEs 116.0 $ 30,597,200
Centers for independent living 18,718,600
Michigan rehabilitation services--FTEs 553.0 155,220,500
Subregional libraries state aid 451,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 204,988,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 884,000
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


DED, vocational rehabilitation and independent
living 147,733,800
Supplemental security income 8,588,600
Special revenue funds:
Local - blind services 100,000
Local - vocational rehabilitation match 5,300,000
Private - blind services, private 111,800
Private - gifts, bequests, and donations 531,500
Michigan business enterprise program fund 350,000
Rehabilitation service fees 116,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 41,272,200
Sec. 105. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 405.0
Bureau of employment relations--FTEs 22.0 $ 4,718,200
Compensation supplement fund 820,000
First responder presumed coverage claims 6,500,000
Insurance funds administration--FTEs 21.0 4,525,300
Michigan occupational safety and health
administration--FTEs 217.0 41,384,700
Office of global Michigan--FTEs 15.0 42,980,700
Private and occupational distance learning--
FTEs 3.0 989,700
Radiation safety section--FTEs 26.0 4,206,100
Wage and hour program--FTEs 33.0 4,781,500
Worker's compensation board of magistrates--
FTEs 10.0 2,341,500
Worker's disability compensation agency--FTEs 56.0 10,255,300
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Worker's disability compensation appeals
commission--FTEs 2.0 363,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 123,866,700
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOL, occupational safety and health 16,746,800
HHS, mammography quality standards 513,300
HHS, refugee assistance program fund 38,419,100
Special revenue funds:
Asbestos abatement fund 888,800
Corporation fees 12,593,300
Distance education fund 486,400
First responder presumed coverage fund 6,500,000
Private occupational school license fees 503,300
Radiological health fees 3,692,800
Safety education and training fund 13,578,700
Second injury fund 2,511,400
Securities fees 11,400,800
Self-insurers security fund 1,448,700
Silicosis and dust disease fund 565,200
Worker's compensation administrative revolving
fund 3,400,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 10,617,700
Sec. 106. UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE AGENCY
Full-time equated classified positions 738.0
Unemployment insurance agency--FTEs 720.0 $ 294,287,000
Unemployment insurance agency - advocacy
assistance--FTEs 4.0 1,500,000
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Unemployment insurance appeals commission--FTEs 14.0 4,430,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 300,217,600
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOL-ETA, unemployment insurance 280,270,300
Special revenue funds:
Contingent fund, penalty and interest 19,947,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 107. COMMISSIONS
Full-time equated classified positions 23.0
Asian Pacific American affairs commission--FTE 1.0 $ 225,900
Commission on Middle Eastern American affairs--
FTE 1.0 216,700
Hispanic/Latino commission of Michigan--FTE 1.0 300,000
Michigan community service commission--FTEs 14.0 19,620,800
Michigan women's commission--FTEs 3.0 1,548,900
Prosperity bureau--FTEs 3.0 922,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 22,834,300
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 18,184,400
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 1,552,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,097,300
Sec. 108. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 31,082,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,082,100
Appropriated from:
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Federal revenues:
DED, vocational rehabilitation and independent
living 3,371,400
DOL-ETA, unemployment insurance 23,003,200
DOL, occupational safety and health 372,300
Federal funds 592,800
Special revenue funds:
Asbestos abatement fund 35,300
Corporation fees 517,500
Distance education fund 20,700
Private occupational school license fees 82,400
Radiological health fees 155,900
Safety education and training fund 403,300
Second injury fund 180,700
Securities fees 1,277,800
Self-insurers security fund 125,600
Silicosis and dust disease fund 45,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 898,200
Sec. 109. MICHIGAN STRATEGIC FUND
Full-time equated classified positions 130.0
Arts and cultural program $ 3,708,800
Job creation services--FTEs 130.0 36,193,700
Lighthouse preservation program 250,000
Michigan office of defense and aerospace
innovation 3,000,000
Pure Michigan 10,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 53,152,500
Appropriated from:
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Federal revenues:
Federal funds 3,000,000
NFAH-NEA, promotion of the arts, partnership
agreement 1,050,000
State historic preservation, national park
service grants 1,900,000
Special revenue funds:
Local promotion fund 5,000,000
Private - Michigan council for the arts fund 200,000
Private - special project advances 200,000
Private promotion fund 5,000,000
Michigan lighthouse preservation fund 250,000
Michigan state housing development authority
fees and charges 4,831,100
State brownfield redevelopment fund 10,007,700
State historic preservation office fees and
charges 511,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 21,202,500
Sec. 110. MICHIGAN STATE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY
Full-time equated classified positions 318.0
Community development block grants $ 47,000,000
Housing and rental assistance--FTEs 318.0 52,875,700
Michigan housing and community development 50,000,000
MSHDA technology services and projects 3,772,600
Payments on behalf of tenants 166,860,000
Property management 3,506,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 324,014,400
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
HUD, lower income housing assistance 166,860,000
HUD-CPD, community development block grant 49,773,300
Special revenue funds:
Michigan housing and community development fund 50,000,000
Michigan state housing development authority
fees and charges 57,381,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 111. STATE LAND BANK AUTHORITY
Full-time equated classified positions 9.0
State land bank authority--FTEs 9.0 $ 6,429,900
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,429,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal revenues 1,000,000
Special revenue funds:
Land bank fast track fund 3,402,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,027,400
Sec. 112. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Arts and cultural program $ 10,000,000
Business attraction, community revitalization,
entrepreneurial ecosystem 60,000,000
Community college skilled trades equipment
program 3,017,500
Competitive community infrastrcture grants 10,000,000
Facility for rare isotope beams 7,300,000
Michigan housing and community development 10,000,000
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Museum support 1,500,000
Public radio 250,000
Special events and national convention
attraction 6,000,000
Talent partnership 5,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 113,067,500
Appropriated from:
Contingent fund, penalty and interest account 3,017,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 110,050,000

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$453,177,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources
to be paid to local units of government is $36,399,500.00. The
following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which
spending to local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
Arts and cultural program $ 2,940,000
At-risk youth grants 5,184,500
Michigan rehabilitation services 275,000
Workforce development programs 28,000,000
TOTAL $ 36,399,500
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "Department" means the department of labor and economic
opportunity and entities contained within its organization,
including, but not limited to, the fund.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(d) "Fund", unless the context clearly implies a different
meaning, means the Michigan strategic fund.
(e) "MEDC" means the Michigan economic development
corporation, which is the public body corporate created under
section 28 of article VII of the state constitution of 1963 and the
urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to
124.512, by contractual interlocal agreement effective April 5,
1999, between local participating economic development corporations
formed under the economic development corporations act, 1974 PA
338, MCL 125.1601 to 125.1636, and the fund.
(f) "MEGA" means the Michigan economic growth authority.
(g) "MiSTEM" means Michigan science, technology, engineering,
and mathematics.
(h) "MSHDA" means the Michigan state housing development
authority.
(i) "PATH" means Partnership. Accountability. Training. Hope.
(j) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on labor and economic opportunity, the
senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy
offices, and the state budget office.
(k) "STEM" means science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(l) "USDOL" means the United States Department of Labor.
Sec. 204. The department shall use the internet to fulfill the
reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report
readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other
required recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare
a report on out‐of‐state travel expenses not later than January 1.
The report must list all travel outside this state by classified
and unclassified employees in the previous fiscal year that was
funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the
department's budget. The department shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the senate and house of
representatives appropriations committees. The report must include
all of the following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and house of
representatives appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $560,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $11,000,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. The department shall cooperate with the department
of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable
website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is
not limited to, all of the following for the department:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 213. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of a local health officer.
Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 451, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract
with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises
for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section,
"geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term
as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
Sec. 215. On a quarterly basis, the department or agency
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on the number of
full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service
classification, including a comparison by line item of the number
of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated
in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions
employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The
report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and the
senate and house of representatives appropriations committees.
Sec. 216. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 217. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit
the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and
house appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 218. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 219. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds and capital projects funds
allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021,
Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


law. Any state fiscal recovery funds and capital projects funds
that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026 are
automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 220. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-
2, must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, the department to which the funds
are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 221. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 222. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the
house of representatives and senate shall provide to the state
budget office a jointly agreed-upon list of legislatively directed
spending items funded in part 1 as defined in sections 364 and 364a
of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and
18.1364a. The list must include all information and documents
pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance
with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984
PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and post an updated report not later than June 15 of the
current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report the
most comprehensive information the department has available at the
time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 223. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office must be
monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on the
timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by
the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization
and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to the rules and regulations
of civil service, which state that the standard biweekly work
period for a full-time employee in the classified service is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 224. A department or agency that receives an
appropriation under this part or part 1 must provide an annual
report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
(a) Affect the operations of the department, including
reductions in federal revenue. For federal revenue reductions, the
annual report must detail the impact on the department or agency
and residents of this state, including, but not limited to, all of
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


the following information:
(i) The amount of additional state revenue required to replace
the lost federal revenue.
(ii) The services the department or agency will have to reduce
or eliminate due to the lost revenue.
(iii) The anticipated fiscal impact on residents of this state.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department or agency.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
(d) Increase the department's or agency's costs.
(e) Reduce or eliminate a program that provides services to
residents of this state.
Sec. 227. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, the department, agency, and
legislature shall submit an annual report that summarizes all work
project accounts. The report must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 228. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $29,919,000.00. From this amount, total
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department
are estimated at $29,919,000.00. Total appropriations for retiree
health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 229. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984, PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 230. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 231. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The report
must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 232. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp



DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
Sec. 302. Federal pass-through funds to local institutions and
governments that are received in amounts in addition to those
included in part 1 and that do not require additional state
matching funds are appropriated for the purposes intended. The
department may carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year
unexpended federal pass-through funds to local institutions and
governments that do not require additional state matching funds.
The department shall report the amount and source of the funds to
the standard report recipients not later than 10 business days
after receiving any additional pass-through funds.
Sec. 303. Requirements under this part applicable to the fund
and the fund's activities apply regardless of whether the fund
delegates its functions and authority to the MEDC.
Sec. 304. (1) Grants supported with private revenues received
by the department are appropriated upon receipt and are available
for expenditure by the department for purposes specified within the
grant agreement and as permitted under state and federal law.
(2) Not later than 10 days after the receipt of a private
grant appropriated in subsection (1), the department shall notify
the senate and house chairpersons of the subcommittees, the senate
and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget director of the
receipt of the grant, including the fund source, purpose, and
amount of the grant.
(3) The amount appropriated under subsection (1) must not
exceed $3,000,000.00.
(4) Not later than March 15, the department shall report to
the standard report recipients the amount of private revenue
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


generated in the previous fiscal year and the amount of private
revenue carried forward into the current fiscal year.
Sec. 305. (1) The department may charge registration fees to
attendees of informational, training, or special events that are
sponsored by the department and related to activities that are
under the department's purview.
(2) The fees under subsection (1) must reflect the costs for
the department to sponsor the informational, training, or special
events.
(3) Revenue generated by the registration fees under
subsection (1) is appropriated upon receipt and available for
expenditure to cover the department's costs of sponsoring
informational, training, or special events.
(4) Revenue generated by registration fees under this section
in excess of the department's costs of sponsoring informational,
training, or special events must carry forward to the subsequent
fiscal year and not lapse to the general fund.
(5) The amount appropriated under subsection (3) must not
exceed $500,000.00.
(6) Not later than March 15, the department shall report to
the standard report recipients on the amount of registration fees
generated in the previous fiscal year and the amount of
registration fees carried forward into the current fiscal year.
Sec. 306. (1) The department may sell documents at a price not
to exceed the cost of production and distribution. Money received
from the sale of these documents must revert to the department. In
addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, these funds are
available for expenditure when they are received by the department
of treasury. This subsection applies only to R 418.10101 to R
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


418.101503 of the Michigan Administrative Code.
(2) Unexpended funds at the end of the fiscal year must carry
forward to the subsequent fiscal year and not lapse to the general
fund. The money carried forward under this section must be used as
the first source of funds in the subsequent fiscal year.
(3) Not later than March 15, the department shall report to
the standard report recipients the amount of revenue generated from
the sale of documents produced and distributed by the department in
the previous fiscal year and the amount of revenue generated from
the sale of documents produced and distributed by the department
carried forward into the current fiscal year.
Sec. 307. (1) If the revenue collected by the department for
radiological health administration and projects from fees and
collections exceeds the amount appropriated in part 1, the revenue
must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. The
revenue carried forward under this section must be used as the
first source of funds in the subsequent fiscal year.
(2) Not later than March 15, the department shall report to
the standard report recipients the total amount of revenue from
fees and collections for any radiological health administration and
projects that was carried forward from the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 308. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used by a
department, authority, or agency to purchase an ownership interest
in a casino.
Sec. 309. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall development recommendations for employers on best
practices to support, attract, and retain women in the workforce.
The department may partner with any additional stakeholders the
department deems necessary for completing the recommendations,
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


including the department of civil rights, the department of health
and human services, and the Michigan women's commission. The
recommendations must be published on the department's website not
later than January 1, 2027. The recommendations must include, but
are not limited to, guidance on all of the following:
(a) Postpartum care, including, but not limited to, flexible
scheduling, reasonable accommodations, lactation policies, and
mental health resources.
(b) Menstruation and menopause support, including, but not
limited to, counseling or medical resources, symptoms training, and
insurance coverage.
(c) Fair and transparent pay practices, including, but not
limited to, salary disclosures, clear criteria for raises, and
employer tools to assess compensation and address wage disparities.

MICHIGAN STATE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
Sec. 401. (1) Not later than March 15, MSHDA shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients on the status of the
authority's housing production goals under all financing programs
established or administered by the authority. The report must
include all of the following:
(a) Information on efforts to raise affordable multifamily and
single-family housing production goals.
(b) A summary of each MSHDA program that is intended to
increase the supply of affordable multifamily and single-family
housing.
(c) An explanation of how programs summarized in subdivision
(b) are utilized by the citizens of this state.
(d) MSHDA's status in obtaining its multifamily and single-
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


family housing production goals.
(e) Information on efforts to support the unhoused goals by
regions as determined by MSHDA.
(f) Information on efforts to lower rent and housing purchase
costs goals by each Opportunity Zone Prosperity Region.
(g) A list of all programs that have interdepartmental
coordination with DHHS, which must include a summary of the
coordination efforts between the departments on those programs.
(2) MSHDA shall not restrict eligibility in any financing
program for housing units without a permanent foundation unless
this restriction is required by the funding source.
Sec. 402. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
housing and community development must be expended for projects
allowable under section 58c of the state housing development
authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1458c, and allocated as
follows:
(a) The department shall allocate not less than $9,000,000.00
towards the rehabilitation of housing for low income, very low
income, and extremely low income senior citizens, and eligible
senior citizen facilities. Funding must be allocated as grants. The
department may work with eligible municipalities to administer this
funding. The maximum grant to each eligible municipality must be
not more than $50,000.00 for a single house and $750,000.00 for a
multifamily unit. Before rehabilitation activities occur,
agreements must be signed between the grantee and contactors that
include provisions to compensate, or to provide no-cost housing
options to, inhabitants who are required to be out of their homes
during any duration of construction. Agreements must require a
certificate of compliance or, based on the review by the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


department, be able to attain a certificate of compliance that
eligible upgrades have been completed. The total amount allocated
under this subdivision must be distributed in the following manner:
(i) 80% as preservation grants for interior and exterior
improvements to improve structural foundations of housing stock,
interior or exterior facade improvements, accessibility upgrades,
energy efficiency upgrades, plumbing and septic improvements,
elevator replacement or modernization, generator capacity
improvements, and essential appliance upgrades in areas with the
highest density of very low income and extremely low income senior
citizens.
(ii) 20% as gap financing for the construction of senior
citizen facilities for very low income and extremely low income
senior citizens in rural or disconnected areas.
(b) The department shall allocate not less than $6,000,000.00
for activities related to preventing homelessness by providing
legal services to support eviction defense for individuals around
this state. Funding allocated under this subdivision must be
awarded as follows:
(i) 75% of funding must be awarded to municipalities that had a
tenant right to counsel program in the prior fiscal year or that
establish a tenant right to counsel program during the fiscal year.
(ii) 25% of the funding must be awarded to municipalities to
support housing navigators or social workers in counties with the
highest need.
(c) The department shall allocate not less than $18,000,000.00
for providing down payment assistance and other support for very
low income and extremely low income households that are first-
generation or first-time home buyers. Priority for these funds must
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


be dedicated towards individuals who are buying homes in
historically underserved and disadvantaged areas of this state. The
funds allocated under this subdivision must be distributed in the
following manner:
(i) 85% for first-generation home buyers.
(ii) 15% for first-time home buyers.
(d) The department shall allocate not less than $3,000,000.00
for foreclosure prevention and assistance by providing grants to
nonprofit entities that assist very low income and extremely low
income households in buying out a land contract that individuals
have already entered into, homeownership counseling, and legal
assistance at land contract forfeiture hearings.
(e) The department shall allocate not less than $24,000,000.00
for the preservation of existing housing that includes providing
grants for home repairs and preweatherization to very low income
and extremely low income households. Priority must be given to
communities with the greatest housing and density of those
households.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible senior citizen facility" means a facility that
houses over 80% senior citizens with the senior citizens who reside
in the facility being low income, very low income, and extremely
low income.
(b) "Essential appliance" means a water heater, air
conditioning unit, furnace, or other appliance necessary to
regulate temperature in the home.
(c) "Eligible municipality" means a municipality that has both
of the following:
(i) A municipal landbank.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(ii) An average median household income of less than $48,000.00
per year.
(d) "Extremely low income household" means a person, a family,
or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted household
income is not more than 30% of the area median income, as
determined by the authority.
(e) "Low income household" means a person, a family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted household income
is more than 50%, but not more than 60%, of the area median income,
as determined by the authority.
(f) "Very low income household" means a person, a family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted household income
is not more than 50% of the area median income, as determined by
the authority.
Sec. 405. If the state budget director lapses work project
number TW3235023, the amount of lapsed funds shall be appropriated
in addition to the funds appropriated in part 1 for grants to local
land banks for blight removal or redevelopment projects. Priority
must be given to municipalities that are located in a county that
has a county land bank, have an average median income of not more
than $60,000.00 per year, and have the highest number of blighted
or dilapidated properties. Blight elimination within the local land
bank must be prioritized to projects with the greatest projected
economic impact. The department shall notify the standard report
recipients if funds are appropriated under this subsection.

STATE LAND BANK AUTHORITY
Sec. 451. (1) In addition to the amounts appropriated in part
1, the state land bank authority may expend revenues received under
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


the land bank fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774,
for the purposes authorized by the act, including, but not limited
to, the acquisition, lease, management, demolition, maintenance, or
rehabilitation of real or personal property, payment of debt
service for notes or bonds issued by the authority, and other
expenses to clear or quiet title property held by the authority.
The state land bank authority may establish partnerships with local
land bank authorities.
(2) Not later than March 15, the state land bank authority
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
includes all of the following:
(a) The number of real properties acquired, leased, managed,
demolished, maintained, or rehabilitated in the previous fiscal
year and list any partnerships that the state land bank authority
has with any local land bank authorities.
(b) A list of any properties sold by or otherwise transferred
from the state land bank authority in the previous fiscal year.
(c) A summary of efforts to reduce the inventory of state and
local land banks.

MICHIGAN STRATEGIC FUND
Sec. 501. The report required under section 9 of the Michigan
strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2009, must be transmitted
not later than March 15.
Sec. 502. In addition to the appropriations in part 1, Travel
Michigan may receive and expend private revenue related to the use
of "Pure Michigan" and all other copyrighted slogans and images.
This revenue may come from the direct licensing of the name and
image or from the royalty payments from various merchandise sales.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Revenue collected is appropriated for the marketing of this state
as a travel destination. The funds are available for expenditure
when they are received by the department of treasury. If the fund
receives revenues from the use of "Pure Michigan", the fund shall
provide a report that lists the revenues by source received from
the use of "Pure Michigan" and all other copyrighted slogans and
images. The report must provide a detailed list of expenditures of
revenues received under this section. The report must be provided
to the standard report recipients not later than March 15.
Sec. 503. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for Pure Michigan
must be used for the following purposes:
(a) Conduction of market research regionally, nationally, and
internationally for use in market campaigns.
(b) Production of advertisements for the promotion of Michigan
as a place to live, learn, build, work, play, and succeed.
(c) Placement of advertisements that have a diverse
representation in regional, national, and international market
campaigns to promote Michigan as a state that welcomes all
individuals and families.
(d) Not more than 2.0% of the appropriation for administration
of the program.
(e) Matching marketing campaigns funded from the local
promotion fund or private promotion fund.
(2) With the goal of increasing the population and workforce
of this state, the fund must work in cooperation with local ethnic
chambers and nonprofits that are designed to increase the
population in this state and the international talent in this
state.
(3) The fund may work in cooperation with local units of
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


government, nonprofit entities, and private entities on Pure
Michigan promotion campaigns. The fund shall include agreements
prior to undertaking cooperative marketing campaigns.
(4) The department shall provide an annual report to the
standard report recipients not later than March 15 on the
utilization of funds for eligible activities in subsection (1),
including a breakdown by eligible use, efforts taken to broaden the
scope of marketing activities to diverse populations, a breakdown
of funds spent within this state and outside of this state,
targeted marketing to encourage residents from other states to move
to this state, and how much was expended on market research.
(5) As prescribed by the legislature, funds appropriated to
Pure Michigan must be used only for this state to market itself as
a travel and tourist destination with the sole purpose of
attracting new visitors and retaining former visitors. All of the
following apply to marketing under this subsection:
(a) Promotion may be made by print, television, radio, and
social media.
(b) The purpose of the advertisements under subdivision (a)
must be to attract tourism and leisure travelers to this state.
(c) Advertisements that incorporate the Pure Michigan Byways
campaign satisfy the requirement under subdivision (b).
(6) Each local visitor bureau can only receive dollars
appropriated to Pure Michigan once per fiscal year.
Sec. 504. (1) A local promotion fund is created in the
department. The fund may receive funds from local units of
government and nonprofit entities and deposit these funds into the
local promotion fund. Funds received are available for expenditure
for use in Pure Michigan promotion campaigns. The fund may maintain
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


individual accounts for local units of government and nonprofit
entities that deposit funds into the local promotion fund upon
request from a local unit of government. As used in this
subsection, "local unit of government" includes cities, villages,
townships, counties, and regional councils of government.
(2) Local promotion funds appropriated in part 1 may be used
for media production and placements, national and international
marketing campaigns, and for other activities that promote Michigan
as a place to live, work, and play.
(3) Any unexpended or unencumbered balance must be disposed of
in accordance with the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1101 to 18.1594, unless carryforward authorization has been
otherwise provided for.
(4) The department shall provide a report to the standard
report recipients not later than March 15 on any funds that have
been generated by local units of government and how those funds
have been expended.
Sec. 505. (1) A private promotion fund is created in the
department. The fund may receive funds from private entities and
deposit these funds into the private promotion fund. Funds received
are available for expenditure for use in Pure Michigan promotion
campaigns. The fund may maintain individual accounts for private
entities that deposit funds into the private promotion fund upon
request from a private entity.
(2) Private promotion funds appropriated in part 1 may be used
for media production and placements, national and international
marketing campaigns, and for other activities that promote Michigan
as a place to live, work, and play.
(3) Any unexpended or unencumbered balance shall be disposed
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


of in accordance with the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, unless carryforward authorization has been
otherwise provided for.
Sec. 506. (1) As a condition of receiving funds appropriated
in part 1, the fund must provide a report of all approved
amendments to projects for the immediately preceding year under
sections 88r and 90b of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA
270, MCL 125.2088r and 125.2090b. The report must provide a
description of each amendment, by award, that includes, but is not
limited to, the following:
(a) The amended award amount relative to the prior award
amount.
(b) The amended number of committed jobs relative to the prior
number of committed jobs.
(c) The amended amount of qualified investment committed
relative to the prior amount of qualified investment committed.
(d) A description of any change in scope of the project.
(e) A description of any change in project benchmarks,
deadlines, or completion dates.
(f) The reason or justification for the amendment approval.
(2) In addition to being posted online, the report must be
distributed to the standard report recipients not later than March
15.
Sec. 507. (1) As a condition of receiving funds appropriated
in part 1, the fund must request the following information from the
MEDC:
(a) Approved budget from the MEDC executive committee for the
current fiscal year and actual budget expenditures for the previous
fiscal years.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(b) Expenditures and revenues as part of the current and
previous year budgets, including the available fund balance for the
current and previous fiscal years.
(c) The total number of FTEs, by state and corporate status
and whether the position is currently filled or unfilled.
(d) A reporting of activities, programs, and grants consistent
with the previous fiscal year budget.
(e) A description of all subprograms funded with the business
attraction and community revitalization line item.
(2) Information received by the fund under this section must
be posted online and distributed to the standard report recipients
not later than March 15.
Sec. 508. As a condition of receiving funds under part 1, any
interlocal agreement entered into by the fund must include language
that states that if a local unit of government has a contract or
memorandum of understanding with a private economic development
agency, the MEDC will work cooperatively with that private
organization in that local area.
Sec. 509. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall notify the standard report recipients no later
than 45 days after the purchase of land or options on land and
include in the notification the location of the land, information
on the entity that sold the land, and the purchase price of the
land or option on land.
(2) If land or options on land are purchased under subsection
(1), the fund shall provide a report that provides a list of all
properties purchased, all options on land purchased, the location
of the land purchased, and the purchase price if the fund purchases
options on land or land. The report must be submitted to the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


standard report recipients not later than March 15.
Sec. 510. As a condition for receiving funds in part 1, not
later than March 15, the fund shall provide a report for the
previous fiscal year on the jobs for Michigan investment fund,
created in section 88h of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA
270, MCL 125.2088h. The report must include, but is not limited to,
all of the following:
(a) A detailed listing of revenues, by fund source, to the
jobs for Michigan investment fund. The listing must include the
manner and reason for which the funds were appropriated to the jobs
for Michigan investment fund.
(b) A detailed listing of expenditures, by project, from the
jobs for Michigan investment fund.
(c) A fiscal year-end balance of the jobs for Michigan
investment fund.
Sec. 511. (1) From the appropriations in part 1 to the fund
and granted or transferred to the MEDC, any unexpended or
unencumbered balance must be disposed of in accordance with the
requirements in the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1101 to 18.1594, unless carryforward authorization has been
otherwise provided for.
(2) Any encumbered funds, including encumbered funds
subsequently unobligated, must be used for the same purposes for
which funding was originally appropriated in this part and part 1.
(3) For funds appropriated in part 1 to the fund, any
carryforward authorization subsequently created through a work
project must be preserved until a cash or accrued expenditure has
been executed or the allowable work project time period has
expired.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Sec. 512. (1) As a condition of receiving funds under part 1,
the fund must ensure that the MEDC and the fund comply with all of
the following:
(a) The freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to
15.246.
(b) The open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275.
(c) Annual audits of all financial records by the auditor
general or the auditor general's designee.
(d) All reports required by law to be submitted to the
legislature.
(2) If the MEDC is unable for any reason to perform duties
under this part, the fund may exercise those duties.
Sec. 513. As a condition for receiving the appropriations in
part 1, any staff of the MEDC involved in private fund-raising
activities must not be party to any decisions regarding the
awarding of grants, incentives, or tax abatements from the fund,
the critical industry program, the Michigan strategic site
readiness program, the MEDC, or the MEGA.
Sec. 515. (1) The fund shall report to the standard report
recipients on the status of the film incentives at the same time as
it submits the annual report required under section 455 of the
Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455. The department
of treasury shall provide the fund with the data necessary to
prepare the report. Incentives included in the report shall include
all of the following:
(a) The tax credit provided under section 455 of the Michigan
business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455.
(b) The tax credit provided under section 457 of the Michigan
business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1457.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(c) The tax credit provided under section 459 of the Michigan
business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1459.
(d) The amount of any tax credit claimed under former section
367 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281.
(e) Any tax credits provided for film and digital media
production under the Michigan economic growth authority act, 1995
PA 24, MCL 207.801 to 207.810.
(f) Loans to an eligible production company or film and
digital media private equity fund authorized under section 88d(3),
(4), and (5) of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL
125.2088d.
(2) The report must include all of the following information:
(a) For each tax credit, the number of contracts signed, the
projected expenditures qualifying for the credit, and the estimated
value of the credits. For loans, the number of loans made under
each section, the interest rate of those loans, the loan amount,
the percent of the projected budget of each production financed by
those loans, and the estimated interest earnings from the loan.
(b) For credits authorized under section 455 of the Michigan
business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455, for productions
completed by December 31, the expenditures of each production
eligible for the credit that has filed a request for certificate of
completion with the film office, broken down into expenditures for
goods, services, or salaries and wages and showing separately
expenditures in each local unit of government, including
expenditures for personnel, whether or not they were made to a
Michigan entity, and whether or not they were taxable under the
laws of this state.
(c) For loans, the report must include the number of loans
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


that have been fully repaid, with principal and interest shown
separately, and the number of loans that are delinquent or in
default, and the amount of principal that is delinquent or is in
default.
(d) For each of the tax credit incentives and loan incentives
listed in subsection (1), a breakdown for each project or
production showing each of the following:
(i) The number of temporary jobs created.
(ii) The number of permanent jobs created.
(iii) The number of persons employed in Michigan as a result of
the incentive, on a full-time equated basis.
(3) For any information not included in the report due to the
provisions of section 455(6), 457(6), or 459(6) of the Michigan
business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455, 208.1457, and 208.1459,
the report shall do all of the following:
(a) Indicate how the information would describe the commercial
and financial operations or intellectual property of the company.
(b) Attest that the information has not been publicly
disseminated at any time.
(c) Describe how disclosure of the information may put the
company at a competitive disadvantage.
(4) Any information not disclosed due to the provisions of
section 455(6), 457(6), or 459(6) of the Michigan business tax act,
2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455, 208.1457, and 208.1459, must be presented
at the lowest level of aggregation that would no longer describe
the commercial and financial operations or intellectual property of
the company.
(5) As a condition of receiving funds in part 1, not later
than March 15, the fund shall provide a report on the activities of
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


the Michigan film and digital media office for the previous fiscal
year to the standard report recipients. The report must include,
but is not limited to, a listing of all projects the Michigan film
and digital media office provided assistance on, a listing of the
services provided for each project, and an estimate of investment
leveraged.
Sec. 516. As a condition of receiving an award from the fund,
each business incubator or accelerator that received an award from
the fund must maintain and update a dashboard of indicators to
measure the effectiveness of the business incubator and accelerator
programs. Indicators must include the direct jobs created, new
companies launched as a direct result of business incubator or
accelerator involvement, businesses expanded as a direct result of
business incubator or accelerator involvement, direct investment in
client companies, private equity financing obtained by client
companies, grant funding obtained by client companies, and other
measures developed by the recipient business incubators and
accelerators in conjunction with the MEDC. Dashboard indicators
must be reported for the previous fiscal year and cumulatively, if
available. Each recipient shall submit a copy of their dashboard
indicators to the fund by March 1. The fund shall transmit the
local reports not later than March 15.
Sec. 517. (1) From the appropriations in part 1, the Michigan
arts and culture council shall administer an arts and cultural
grant program that maintains an equitable geographic distribution
of funding and utilizes past arts and cultural grant programs as a
guideline for administering this program. The council shall do all
of the following:
(a) Not later than October 1, publish proposed application
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


criteria, instructions, and forms for use by eligible applicants.
The council shall provide at least a 2-week period for public
comment before finalizing the application criteria, instructions,
and forms.
(b) Assess a nonrefundable application fee that may be applied
for each application. Application fees must be deposited in the
council for the arts fund and are appropriated for expenses
necessary to administer the programs. These funds are available for
expenditure when they are received and may be carried forward to
the subsequent fiscal year.
(c) Issue grants to public and private arts and cultural
entities.
(d) Not later than 1 business day after the award
announcements, provide to each member of the legislature and the
fiscal agencies a list of all grant recipients and the total award
given to each recipient, sorted by county.
(e) In addition to the information in subdivision (d), report
on the number of applications received, number of grants awarded,
total amount requested from applications received, total amount of
grants awarded, and amount of application fees collected in the
previous fiscal year.
(2) Up to 3.0% of the funds appropriated in part 1 for arts
and cultural program may be expended for the administration of the
grant program.
Sec. 518. (1) The general fund/general purpose funds
appropriated in part 1 to the fund for business attraction and
community revitalization must be transferred to the 21st century
jobs trust fund per section 90b(3) of the Michigan strategic fund
act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090b.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(2) Funds transferred to the 21st century jobs trust fund
under subsection (1) are appropriated and available for allocation
as authorized in the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL
125.2001 to 125.2094.
Sec. 519. For the funds appropriated in part 1 for business
attraction and community revitalization, the fund shall report
quarterly to the standard report recipients on the amount of funds
considered appropriated, pre-encumbered, encumbered, and expended
by current fiscal year appropriation and each work project for any
previous fiscal years. The report must also include a listing of
all previous appropriations for business attraction and community
revitalization, or a predecessor, that were considered
appropriated, pre-encumbered, encumbered, or expended that have
lapsed back to the fund for any purpose. The report must be
submitted to the standard report recipients. The report must also
include how much of business attraction and community
revitalization was spent on business development, community
revitalization, small business supports, or community development
financial institutions.
Sec. 520. (1) The fund, in conjunction with the department of
treasury, shall report not later than November 1 on the annual cost
of the MEGA tax credits. The report must include for each year the
board-approved credit amount, adjusted for credit amendments where
applicable, and the actual and projected value of tax credits for
each year from 1995 to the expiration of the credit program. For
years for which credit claims are complete, the report must include
the total of actual certificated credit amounts. For years that
claims are still pending or not yet submitted, the report must
include a combination of actual credits where available and
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


projected credits. Credit projections must be based on updated
estimates of employees, wages, and benefits for eligible companies.
(2) In addition to the report under subsection (1), the fund,
in conjunction with the department of treasury, shall report to the
standard report recipients not later than November 1 on the annual
cost of all other certificated credits by program, for each year
until the credits expire or can no longer be collected. The report
must include estimates on the brownfield redevelopment credit, film
credits, MEGA photovoltaic technology credit, MEGA polycrystalline
silicon manufacturing credit, MEGA vehicle battery credit, and
other certificated credits.
Sec. 521. As a condition of receiving appropriations in part
1, prior to authorizing the transfer of any previously authorized
tax credit that would increase the liability to this state, the
fund, on behalf of the fund's board, must notify the standard
report recipients of the transfer of any previously authorized tax
credit that would increase the liability to this state not fewer
than 30 days prior to the authorization of the tax credit transfer.
Sec. 522. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
business attraction and community revitalization, the fund shall
identify specific outcomes and performance measures, including, but
not limited to, the following:
(a) Total verified jobs created by the business attraction
program during the previous fiscal year.
(b) Total private investment obtained through the business
attraction and community revitalization programs during the
previous fiscal year.
(c) Amount of private and public square footage created and
reactivated through the community revitalization program during the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


previous fiscal year.
(d) A summary of any metrics used to evaluate the outcomes and
performance of the programs.
(e) A list of grants to small business and community support
hubs and any local nonprofits. The list must include partnership
between those recipients.
(f) The amount of interest generated on loans paid back by
entities and the entities that have paid back a loan.
(g) A list of community development financial institutions
that received grants, the projected economic effect of each
project, loans that have been paid back, the default rate, the
average interest charged, and interest generated.
(2) The fund shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients not later than March 15. The report must describe the
specific outcomes and measures required in subsection (1) and
provide the results and data related to these outcomes and measures
for the previous fiscal year if related information is available
for the previous fiscal year. The report must also contain a
summary of any metrics used to evaluate the outcomes and
performance of any programs.
Sec. 523. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the
funds collected by state historic preservation programs for
document reproduction and services and application fees are
appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide the required
services. These funds are available for expenditure when they are
received and may be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal
year.
Sec. 524. Tax capture revenues collected in accordance with
written agreements under the good jobs for Michigan program and
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


transferred from the general fund for deposit into the good jobs
for Michigan fund, and for both calculated payments from the good
jobs for Michigan fund to authorized businesses and distributions
to the fund for administrative expenses, are appropriated under the
provisions of chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984
PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j.
Sec. 525. The department shall provide a report to the
standard report recipients on March 15 that includes, but is not
limited to, fiscal year-to-date expenditures by division and
program unit within the job creation services line item. The report
must contain detailed information on expenditures and programs
within the state historic preservation office, including a list of
any entities that receive financial support from the state historic
preservation office.
Sec. 526. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
office of defense and aerospace innovation shall be used by the
Michigan strategic fund to protect and grow the defense and
homeland security industry in this state by protecting this state's
current department of defense missions, infrastructure, and
industry, including securing new missions and increasing defense
and homeland security spending in this state. These funds may be
used for, but are not limited to, the following activities:
(a) Helping businesses in this state identify federal defense
contract opportunities.
(b) Providing technical assistance for bid responses to
federal defense contracts.
(c) Strengthening cybersecurity compliance at businesses in
this state to qualify for federal defense contracts.
(d) Not less than 25.0% must be dedicated to improving
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


workforce development initiatives for individuals who are less than
25 years old. The Michigan office of defense and aerospace
innovation may work with the MiSTEM advisory council on developing
youth pipelines to defense, homeland security, and aerospace
industries.
(2) Not later than March 15, the Michigan office of defense
and aerospace innovation shall provide an annual report to the
standard report recipients. The report must include, but is not
limited to, all of the following:
(a) A strategic plan for the organization.
(b) An overview of the defense industry in this state,
including identification of recent accomplishments and services
provided to businesses in this state in the most recent year.
(c) A list of expenditures used to fund memberships in
organizations and costs associated with attending conferences and
expositions in the previous fiscal year.
(d) The most recent annual figures on direct domestic defense-
related contracts and grants awarded to Michigan-based entities in
the previous fiscal year.
(e) A summary of contracts or defense industry business with
international clients.
Sec. 527. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
Michigan strategic fund, the fund shall reserve $10,000,000.00 in
the jobs for Michigan investment fund for the purposes described in
this section as a separate Michigan community impact revolving loan
fund within the jobs for Michigan investment fund. All loans and
interest repaid must be deposited into the Michigan community
impact revolving loan fund and be available for additional grants
and loans described under this section.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(2) The fund shall create the Michigan community impact fund
program to provide grants to qualified nonprofits for eligible
activities. The Michigan community impact fund program must be
operated and administered by authorized officers, employees, or
agents of the fund, including by the MEDC and its employees.
(3) By November 1, 2026, the fund shall develop a grant
application in accordance with the requirements of this section.
The fund shall accept applications for 45 days after the
application process is published. A grant application must include
all of the following information:
(a) The name of the applicant.
(b) The location of the principal office of the applicant.
(c) Documentation indicating whether the applicant is a
qualified nonprofit.
(d) A list of the applicant's board of directors.
(e) A description of the proposed use of the grant award by
the applicant for eligible activities.
(f) A list and description of any partners affiliated with the
qualified revolving loan fund.
(g) A timeline for implementation of eligible activities.
(4) The fund shall approve or deny a grant application within
45 days of receiving a grant application. If the application
complies with the requirements of this section, the fund shall
approve the award of the grant in the amount requested by the
applicant. The fund may deny grant applications submitted under
this section for the following reasons:
(a) The applicant does not satisfy all of the requirements
described in this section.
(b) Subject to this section, there is insufficient money in
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


the jobs for Michigan investment fund to pay the grant amount
requested.
(5) On approval of an application, the fund and the applicant
shall sign a written grant agreement providing the terms of the
grant agreement. A grant agreement must include all of the
following:
(a) A requirement that the grant awarded be committed under a
fund agreement for eligible activities by the recipient within 1
year of the date that the recipient receives the grant award.
(b) A requirement that the entire amount of the grant awarded
from the Michigan community impact revolving loan fund be expended
within this state.
(c) A requirement that the grant award recipient is certified
as a community development financial institution under 12 CFR
1805.201 while the grant agreement is in effect.
(d) A requirement that the grant award recipient comply with
all requirements applicable under the community development banking
and financial institutions act of 1994 while the agreement is in
effect.
(e) Provisions authorizing the fund to enforce the terms of
the grant agreement, including a requirement that a noncompliant
recipient of a grant award may be required to repay the portion of
the award not committed by the recipient pursuant to a permitted
loan, program, or agreement. Money repaid under this subdivision
must be deposited into the Michigan community impact revolving loan
fund.
(f) A requirement for the grant award recipient to report on
activities consistent with the requirements of subsection (6).
(6) The fund shall require a recipient of a grant awarded
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


under this section to report annually to the fund regarding the
activities under this section by March 1, regarding information
from the previous fiscal year. The fund shall submit a report to
the standard report recipients by March 15 that includes, but is
not limited to, all of the following:
(a) A list of community development financial institutions
receiving grants from the Michigan community impact revolving loan
fund.
(b) A list of loan transactions made by the community
development financial institutions that received grants from the
qualified revolving loan fund during the prior fiscal year that
includes all of the following:
(i) The name of each transaction.
(ii) A transition tracking number for each transaction.
(iii) The date of each transaction.
(iv) The amount of each transaction.
(v) The total project cost for each transaction if other
funding was involved.
(vi) The physical address of the borrower or customer for each
transaction.
(vii) The census tract of the borrower or customer for each
transaction.
(viii) An indication of whether the census tract in which the
transaction is located is an eligible investment area.
(ix) A description of the projected economic impact of the
transaction.
(x) A description of any loan type, financial products, or
financial services provided.
(7) The fund shall not include information in the report
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


required under subsection (6) if the information is either of the
following:
(a) Exempt from disclosure or confidential as proprietary
business or financial information under the community development
banking and financial institutions act of 1994.
(b) Exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information
act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246.
(8) The legislature finds and declares that activities under
this section are for community economic revitalization and
community development through community development financial
institutions and will increase lending capacity to support economic
recovery, including support for small businesses, housing and
redevelopment projects, and consumer loans to promote financial
capability, and is for a public purpose. It is the intent of the
legislature that the economic benefits resulting from this section
occur substantially within this state.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Community development banking and financial institutions
act of 1994" means subtitle A of the Riegle community development
and regulatory improvement act of 1994, 12 USC 4701 to 4719.
(b) "Community development financial institution" means that
term as defined in section 103 of the community development banking
and financial institutions act of 1994, 12 USC 4702.
(c) "Depository institution" means any of the following:
(i) A bank as that term is defined in section 3(a) of the
federal deposit insurance act, 12 USC 1813.
(ii) A savings association as that term is defined in section
3(b) of the federal deposit insurance act, 12 USC 1813.
(iii) A credit union as that term is defined in section 102 of
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


the credit union act, 2003 PA 215, MCL 490.102.
(iv) A depository institution holding company as that term is
defined in 12 CFR 1805.104.
(d) "Eligible activities" means the creation of a qualified
revolving loan fund by a qualified nonprofit.
(e) "Federal fund" means the community development financial
institutions fund established under section 104 of the community
development banking and financial institutions act of 1994, 12 USC
4703, and moved within the United States Department of Treasury by
the emergency supplemental appropriations for additional disaster
assistance, for anti-terrorism initiatives, for assistance in the
recovery from the tragedy that occurred at Oklahoma City, and
rescissions act, 1995, Public Law 104-19, and by Public Law 104-
134.
(f) "Qualified nonprofit" means a Michigan nonprofit
corporation that is incorporated with the primary goal of building
the capacity of community development financial institutions.
(g) "Qualified revolving loan fund" means a loan fund operated
by a qualified nonprofit that provides low-interest loans to
community development financial institutions for the purposes of
providing loans to residents of the state as allowed by the federal
fund.
Sec. 528. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for job
creation services shall support the office of small business growth
within the Michigan economic development corporation to lead,
coordinate, and administer statewide programs, services, and
investments that support the launch, resilience, and growth of
small businesses in this state, including a focus on and support
for microbusinesses.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(2) The office shall serve as this state's primary point of
coordination for small business development, technical assistance,
access to capital, and cross-agency small business initiatives.
(3) The office shall perform duties under this section that
include all of the following:
(a) Develop and enhance a statewide, collaborative, public-
private partner network to accelerate small business formation,
resilience, and scale.
(b) Administer grants, loans, and investments to
organizations, intermediaries, and subject-matter experts that
provide technical assistance, coaching, consulting, training, or
other services that support small business success.
(c) Administer grants, loans, and investments directly to
Michigan-headquartered small businesses to advance strategic
company or industry growth objectives, including supply chain
resiliency, clean energy integration, technology adoption, and
global competitiveness.
(d) Coordinate with lenders, financial institutions, industry
partners, and other key stakeholders to strengthen and expand
access to capital for small businesses, including addressing
industry, regional, and demographic gaps in lending, enhancing
capital readiness, and supporting innovative financing models that
improve small business growth and resilience.
(e) Lead cross-agency coordination with relevant state
departments to improve small business navigation of state
resources, regulatory processes, and programs connected to business
launch, resilience, and expansion.
(f) Align small business services with this state's broader
entrepreneurship, innovation, and economic development strategies,
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


including leveraging state and federal funding, data, evaluation,
and ecosystem-building efforts.
(g) Collect and analyze data to monitor program effectiveness,
vendor and partner impact, and small business outcomes, and ensure
transparency and accountability through public reporting.
(h) Create, implement, and update a statewide strategic plan
for creation and distribution of economic growth services focused
on economic gardening. This plan must be developed and maintained
with ongoing engagement with regionally representative
stakeholders.
(4) The office may enter into agreements, contracts, or
partnerships with public, private, nonprofit, philanthropic, and
academic partners necessary to carry out the responsibilities under
this section and to implement programs and initiatives supporting
small business development statewide.
(5) The office may establish eligibility criteria, application
processes, compliance requirements, and reporting standards for
recipients of funds administered under this section.
(6) The office shall submit an annual report to the standard
report recipients that includes, but is not limited to, all of the
following information:
(a) Expenditures made under this section.
(b) Partner and program performances.
(c) Measurable small business outcomes in this state.
(d) Regional and demographic distribution of services and
investments.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Microbusiness" means a business headquartered in this
state with fewer than 25 employees.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(b) "Small business" means a business headquartered in this
state with fewer than 200 employees.

EMPLOYMENT SERVICES
Sec. 601. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for wage and
hour program, the department shall continue to engage with
employers and employees to enhance education and outreach, in
accordance with the youth employment standards act, 1978 PA 90, MCL
409.101 to 409.124, 1978 PA 390, MCL 408.471 to 408.490, the
improved workforce opportunity wage act, 2018 PA 337, MCL 408.931
to 408.945, the earned sick time act, 2018 PA 338, MCL 408.961 to
408.974, the human trafficking notification act, 2016 PA 62, MCL
752.1031 to 752.1040, and 2023 PA 10, MCL 408.1101 to 408.1126, and
private right of action. In addition to the funds appropriated in
part 1, all funds received in the prevailing wage fund created in
section 25a of 2023 PA 10, MCL 408.1125a, are appropriated for the
purposes allowable under section 25a of 2023 PA 10, MCL 408.1125a.
Sec. 602. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
all funds necessary to pay approved claims and administrative costs
incurred during this fiscal year, as allowed in the Christopher R.
Slezak first responder presumed coverage fund created in section
405 of the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA
317, MCL 418.405, are appropriated for the purposes authorized
under section 405 of the worker's disability compensation act of
1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.405.
(2) The department shall provide a year-end report to the
Michigan gaming control board, the department of treasury, and the
state budget office that includes, but is not limited to, the total
of all approved claims and administrative costs incurred as of
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


September 30 of the current fiscal year.

WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
Sec. 701. The department shall administer the PATH training
program in accordance with the requirements of section 407(d) of
title IV of the social security act, 42 USC 607, the social welfare
act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, and all other applicable
laws and regulations.
Sec. 702. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
workforce development, the department may allocate funding for
grants to nonprofit organizations that offer programs under the
workforce innovation and opportunity act, 29 USC 3101 to 3361, for
eligible youth that focus on apprenticeship readiness, pre-
apprenticeship and apprenticeship activities, entrepreneurship,
work-readiness skills, job shadowing, or financial literacy.
Additionally, programs eligible for funding under this section must
include the participation of local business partners. The
department shall develop other appropriate eligibility requirements
to ensure compliance with applicable federal rules and regulations.
(2) Not later than March 15, the department shall report at
least all of the following:
(a) Total grants expended under this section in the previous
fiscal year.
(b) The total number of students served from the grants
appropriated under this section.
(c) A list of all organizations and the amount each
organization received from the funding appropriated under this
section.
Sec. 703. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


department shall make available, in person or by telephone, 1
disabled veterans outreach program specialist or local veterans
employment representative to Michigan works service centers, as
resources permit, during hours of operation, and shall continue to
make the appropriate placement of veterans and disabled veterans a
priority.
Sec. 704. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
any unencumbered and unrestricted funds allocated under the federal
workforce innovation and opportunity act, 29 USC 3101 to 3361, or
trade adjustment assistance funds available from previous fiscal
years are appropriated for the purposes originally intended.
(2) The department shall report to the standard report
recipients not later than March 15 on the amount, by fiscal year,
of funds allocated under the federal workforce innovation and
opportunity act, 29 USC 3101 to 3361, appropriated under this
section.
Sec. 705. (1) The department shall publish data and reports on
March 15 and September 15 on the department website concerning the
status of Going pro funded in part 1. The report must include the
following:
(a) The number of awardees participating in the program and
the names of those awardees organized by major industry group.
(b) The amount of funding received by each awardee under the
program.
(c) The amount of funding leveraged from each awardee.
(d) The training models established by each awardee.
(e) The number of individuals enrolled in classroom training,
on-the-job training, or new USDOL registered apprentices.
(f) The number of qualified employees who completed the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


approved training.
(g) The number of applications received and the number of
grants awarded for each region.
(h) The number of individuals hired and trained, the number of
incumbent workers trained, and the number of USDOL registered
apprentices.
(i) Going pro expenditures by fiscal year. Active fiscal years
must display projected expenditure data and closed fiscal years
must display final expenditure data.
(2) The department shall expand workforce training and
reemployment services to better connect workers to in-demand jobs
and identify specific outcomes with performance metrics for this
initiative, including, but not limited to, new apprenticeships,
individuals to be hired and trained, current employees trained,
training completed, employment retention rate at 6 months, and
hourly wage at 6 months.
Sec. 706. To the extent consistent with sections 7 and 9 of
the Going pro talent fund act, 2018 PA 260, MCL 408.157 and
408.159, the department shall administer the program as follows:
(a) The department shall work cooperatively with grantees to
maximize the amount of funds from part 1 that are available for
direct training.
(b) The department, workforce development partners, including
regional Michigan works agencies, and employers shall collaborate
and work cooperatively to prioritize and streamline the expenditure
of the funds appropriated in part 1. The department shall ensure
that Going pro provides a collaborative statewide network of
workforce and employee skill development partners that addresses
the employee talent needs throughout this state.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(c) The department shall do all of the following:
(i) Develop program goals and detailed guidance for prospective
participants to follow to qualify under the program.
(ii) Post the program goals and detailed guidance on the
department's website and distribute the program goals and detailed
guidance to workforce development partners, including local
Michigan works agencies, not later than October 1.
(iii) Conduct periodic assessments of employer and employee
needs that are evaluated on a regional basis.
(iv) Identify solutions and goals to be implemented to satisfy
employer and employee needs.
(v) Add scoring criteria that incentivize awards to new and
diverse program applicants.
(d) The department shall use not more than 2% of the total
Going pro appropriation for administration of the program.
(e) Not less than 5% of available funding must be reserved for
businesses in talent fund priority industry sectors that submit
competitive applications.
(f) Allow the MiSTEM council to assist in processing grant
applications.
Sec. 707. The funds appropriated in part 1 for MiSTEM advisory
council must be used to support the staff for the MiSTEM network,
and for administrative, training, and travel costs related to the
MiSTEM council. The staff for the MiSTEM network shall do all of
the following:
(a) Serve as a liaison among and between the department, the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, the
department of education, the MiSTEM council, the governor's
workforce development board, the MiSTEM regions, and any other
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


relevant organization or entity in a manner that creates a robust
statewide STEM culture, empowers STEM teachers, integrates business
and education into the STEM network, and ensures high-quality STEM
experiences for pupils.
(b) Coordinate the implementation of a marketing campaign,
including, but not limited to, a website that includes dashboards
of outcomes, to build STEM awareness and communicate STEM needs and
opportunities to pupils, parents, educators, and the business
community.
(c) Work with the department of education and the MiSTEM
council to coordinate, award, and monitor MiSTEM state and federal
grants to the MiSTEM network regions and conduct reviews of grant
recipients, including, but not limited to, pupil experience and
feedback.
(d) Report to the governor, the legislature, and the MiSTEM
council annually on the activities and performance of the MiSTEM
network regions.
(e) Coordinate recurring discussions and work with regional
staff to ensure that a network or loop of feedback and best
practices are shared, including funding, programming, professional
learning opportunities, discussion of MiSTEM strategic vision, and
regional objectives.
(f) Coordinate major grant application efforts with the MiSTEM
council to assist regional staff with grant applications on a local
level. The MiSTEM council shall leverage private and nonprofit
relationships to coordinate and align private funds in addition to
funds appropriated under this section.
(g) Train state and regional staff in the STEMworks rating
system, in collaboration with the MiSTEM council and the Michigan
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


department of education.
(h) Hire MiSTEM network region staff in collaboration with the
network region fiscal agent.
Sec. 708. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
workforce development, the department shall provide a report on the
status of workforce development not later than March 15 to the
standard report recipients. The report must include the following:
(a) The amount of funding allocated to each Michigan works
agency and the total funding allocated to the workforce training
programs statewide by fund source.
(b) The number of participants enrolled in education or
training programs by each Michigan works agency.
(c) The average duration of training for training program
participants by each Michigan works agency.
(d) The number of participants enrolled in remedial education
programs and the number of participants enrolled in literacy
programs.
(e) The number of participants enrolled in programs at 2-year
institutions.
(f) The number of participants enrolled in programs at 4-year
institutions.
(g) The number of participants enrolled in proprietary schools
and technical training programs.
(h) The number of participants who completed an education or
training program.
(i) The number of participants who completed a training
program and secured employment in a field related to their
training.
(j) The average wage earned by participants who completed a
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


training program and secured employment within 1 year.
(k) The actual revenues received by the fund source and fund
appropriated for each discrete workforce development program area.
(l) The average cost of training per individual served, with an
average provided for participants at 2-year institutions,
participants at 4-year institutions, participants at proprietary
schools, and participants at technical training programs.
(m) The number of applicants to an apprenticeship program, the
number of participants in an apprenticeship program, and the number
of participants who completed an apprenticeship program.
(2) Data collection for the report must be for the previous
state fiscal year.
Sec. 710. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for 23+ high
school diploma program must be awarded for a grant program to
assist Michigan residents 23 years of age or older in obtaining
high school diplomas and placement in career training programs.
(2) For purposes of this section, an eligible program provider
may be a public, nonprofit, or private accredited diploma-granting
institution, but must have not less than 2 years of experience
providing dropout recovery services in this state.
(3) The department shall issue a request for qualifications
for eligible program providers to participate in the program. To be
considered a qualified program provider, the institution must offer
all of the following:
(a) Dropout reengagement services.
(b) Academic intake assessments.
(c) An integrated learning plan.
(d) A course catalog that includes all graduation
requirements.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(e) Remediation coursework.
(f) Academic resilience assessment and intervention.
(g) Employability skills development, which includes WorkKeys
preparation.
(h) Industry recognized credentials.
(i) Credit for on-the-job training.
(j) A robust support framework, including technology, social
support, and academic support.
(4) The department shall announce qualified program providers
not later than January 1 of the current fiscal year. Qualified
program providers must start providing programming by February 1 of
the current fiscal year. The department may prioritize funding for
previously qualified program providers based on the highest number
of students previously served, highest number of graduates, and
previous ability to offer statewide access.
(5) The department shall reimburse qualified program providers
for each month of satisfactory monthly progress as described in
section 23a of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL
388.1623a, at a rate of $500.00 per month. A payment shall be made
to a qualified program provider for the completion of the following
by an eligible participant:
(a) $500.00 for the completion of an employability skills
program equal to at least 1 unit of high school credit obtained
through classroom or online instruction.
(b) $250.00 for the attainment of an industry-recognized
credential requiring up to 50 hours of training.
(c) $500.00 for the attainment of an industry-recognized
credential requiring 50 to 100 hours of training.
(d) $750.00 for the attainment of an industry-recognized
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


credential requiring more than 100 hours of training.
(e) $1,000.00 for the attainment of a high school diploma
awarded for satisfying Michigan merit curriculum requirements or an
approved personal curriculum, as defined by the Michigan department
of education.
(f) $2,500.00 for placement in a job in an in-demand career
pathway.
(6) The department shall develop policies and guidelines to
implement this section.
Sec. 711. The funds for at-risk youth grants in part 1 must be
provided to a Michigan-based nonprofit organization with
demonstrated experience delivering statewide youth career
development programming. The organization must operate a career
development-focused, multi-tiered system of supports, align
programming with the Michigan career development model, and provide
services to both in-school and out-of-school youth across multiple
regions of this state. The organization must maintain established
partnerships with local education agencies and workforce
development boards and possess the organizational capacity to
distribute funds statewide. In conjunction with the department, the
organization shall utilize a formula-based methodology to allocate
funds across all 10 prosperity regions based on regional program
performance, capacity, and the concentration of youth facing
barriers to employment or postsecondary success.
Sec. 712. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the high
school equivalency-to-school program must be used to purchase and
distribute vouchers that cover the cost of high school equivalency
testing and certification under this section. The department shall
administer a Michigan high school equivalency-to-school program
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


that covers the cost of taking a high school equivalency test free
of charge for individuals who meet all of the following
requirements:
(a) The individual has not previously been administered a high
school equivalency test free of charge under this section.
(b) The individual meets at least 1 of the following
requirements:
(i) Prior to taking the high school equivalency test, the
individual successfully completed a department-approved high school
equivalency preparation program.
(ii) Prior to taking the high school equivalency test, the
individual completed the official high school equivalency practice
test and the individual's score indicated that the individual is
likely to pass.
(2) A department-approved high school equivalency preparation
program must include all of the following:
(a) Instructional and tutorial assistances.
(b) High school equivalency test practice.
(c) Required attendance at program instructional sessions.
(d) A curriculum that prepares students for opportunities in
postsecondary education and the job market.
(e) Information on potential postsecondary and career
pathways.
(f) Counseling on preparing for and applying to college.
(g) Personal and job readiness skills development.
(h) Comprehensive information on college costs and financial
aid.
(i) College and career assessments.
(j) Computer-based instruction, practice, or remediation.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(3) The department shall post online an announcement of the
Michigan high school equivalency-to-school program, minimum
standards for high school equivalency preparation program approval,
and approval procedures.
(4) The department shall do all of the following:
(a) Develop procedures consistent with this section under
which individuals can take the high school equivalency test without
charge.
(b) Provide program information for educators and students on
the department website, including explanations of the procedures
developed under subparagraph (a), and contact information for
questions about the program.
(c) Provide an estimate of the full-year cost of the program
to the standard report recipients.
(5) Not later than September 30, the department shall report
on utilization of the high school equivalency incentive program to
the standard report recipients, including numbers of high school
equivalency certifications issued by location, year-to-date
expenditures, and numbers of participants qualifying under
subsection (1)(b)(i) or (ii), or both.
Sec. 713. (1) The department shall provide reporting regarding
the interagency agreement with the department of health and human
services, which concerns TANF funding to provide job readiness and
welfare-to-work programming. The reporting must include specific
outcome and performance reporting requirements, as described in
this section. TANF funding provided to the department in the
current fiscal year is contingent on compliance with the data and
reporting requirements described in this section. The department
shall provide all of the following items for the previous year not
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


later than January 1 of the current fiscal year:
(a) An itemized spending report on TANF funding, including all
of the following:
(i) Direct services to clients.
(ii) Administrative expenditures.
(b) The number of family independence program clients served
through the TANF funding, including all of the following:
(i) The number and percentage who obtained employment through
Michigan Works!.
(ii) The number and percentage who fulfilled their TANF work
requirement through other job readiness programming.
(iii) Average TANF spending per client.
(iv) The number and percentage of clients who were referred to
Michigan Works! but did not receive a job or job readiness
placement and the reasons why.
(2) Not later than March 15 of the current fiscal year, the
department shall provide to the senate and house appropriations
subcommittees on health and human services and the standard report
recipients an annual report on the following matters itemized by
Michigan works agency:
(a) The number of referrals to Michigan works job readiness
programs.
(b) The number of referrals to Michigan works job readiness
programs who became a participant in the Michigan works job
readiness programs.
(c) The number of participants who obtained employment.
(d) The cost per participant case.
(3) As used in this section, "TANF" means temporary assistance
for needy families as described in 42 USC 601 to 619.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Sec. 714. (1) The office of rural prosperity shall encourage
and enable appropriate community advancements and improvements,
including, but not limited to, all of the following:
(a) Housing.
(b) Infrastructure.
(c) Education.
(d) Workforce development.
(e) Other activities that address needs uniquely present in
rural areas of this state and assist in expansion of rural
development.
(2) Not later than March 15, the office of rural prosperity
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that
outlines the office's activities, programs, and accomplishments in
the previous fiscal year. To the extent possible, the report must
also include information regarding the amount of subsequent grant
funding that entities are able to secure after receiving assistance
from the office of rural prosperity or an office of rural
prosperity grant.
Sec. 715. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
community and worker economic transition office, the department may
hire employees and deploy capabilities to evaluate and address the
impacts of economic transitions on workers, communities, and
employers in sectors that include, but are not limited to, the
auto, utility, manufacturing, and building trades sectors.
Activities of the office may include developing transition
mitigation strategies, conducting data analysis, coordinating
across state and federal agencies, engaging stakeholders, and
providing resource navigation support. No later than March 15, the
department shall also submit an annual report on office activities
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


and progress made on the transition plan to the standard report
recipients and to the legislature, as required under section 7(5)
of the community and worker economic transition act, 2023 PA 232,
MCL 408.917.
(2) In the annual report submitted under subsection (1), the
department shall include information on the mission statement,
goals, metrics, and recommendations of the community and worker
economic transition office. The report must also include a list of
impacts on workers, communities, and employers in each economic
sector experiencing economic transition in addition to the auto,
utility, manufacturing, and building trades sectors.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community and
worker economic transition office, $250,000.00 must be used to
recruit and assist veterans to transition into apprenticeship
programs in this state for quality career opportunities in the
construction industry. These activities may be contracted to a
national nonprofit program that connects National Guard, reserve,
retired, and transitioning active-duty military service members
with skilled training and quality career opportunities in the
construction industry.
Sec. 717. The department's office of rural prosperity shall
collaborate with the department of agriculture and rural
development on the rural development fund grant program as part of
this state's coordinated strategy for achieving rural prosperity
across this state.
Sec. 719. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for workforce
development, $1,000,000.00 must be allocated toward reentry
employment services grants that provide funding to nonprofit
organizations that operate a program that satisfies all of the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


following conditions:
(a) The program provides services to parolees and probationers
assessed by the department of corrections as moderate or high risk
to recidivate.
(b) The program provides job readiness training, transitional
employment, job coaching and placement, and postplacement retention
services. As part of the transitional employment program phase, the
nonprofit program must provide low-skill, crew-based services to
other state agencies.
(c) The program has been independently and rigorously
evaluated and shown to reduce recidivism.
(d) The program demonstrates an ability to serve multiple
jurisdictions across this state.
Sec. 720. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
workforce development, the department must maintain an online form
that allows individuals interested in receiving information on
registered apprenticeships to share their interest with the
department. The department must share the information of those who
enter their information in that form with any entity who receives
funding under part 1 for registered apprenticeships, if the
registered apprenticeship recipient offers programs within 50 miles
of their geographic area. An entity that receives funding under
part 1 and receives information from interested parties must
attempt to contact the interested party with information on their
registered apprenticeship program not more than 10 business days
after receiving information from the department.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for workforce
development, the department shall prioritize funding to registered
apprenticeship programs that produce the highest job placement and
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


starting wage rates after the individual completes the registered
apprenticeship program.

UNEMPLOYMENT
Sec. 801. The unemployment insurance agency shall provide a
report updated at least quarterly that includes, but is not limited
to, fiscal year-to-date expenditures by division and program unit.
The unemployment insurance agency shall transmit each quarterly
report no later than 60 days after the end of each quarter.
Sec. 802. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department, on behalf of the unemployment insurance agency, shall
provide a quarterly report to the standard report recipients not
later than 60 days after the end of each quarter that includes, but
is not limited to, the following:
(a) The average number of unique claimants for the quarter.
(b) The average number of eligible claimants with
certification for the quarter.
(c) The average number of claims paid for the quarter.
(d) The total amount of standard unemployment insurance
payments paid for the quarter.
(e) The total amount of unemployment insurance tax generated
for the quarter.
(f) The balance of the Michigan unemployment trust fund at the
end of the quarter.
(2) The department shall include the same information required
in subsection (1) for the previous 12 months. The department shall
include the most recent quarterly report on the department's
webpage.
Sec. 803. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


department shall provide a quarterly report not later than 60 days
after the end of each quarter that includes, but is not limited to,
the following:
(a) The number of new fraudulent and noncompliant cases that
have been identified or issued by the unemployment insurance
agency, classified by employer or claimant, during the quarter.
(b) The total amount of penalties and interest issued on
fraudulent and noncompliant cases during the quarter.
(c) The total amount of penalties and interest dollars
received during the quarter by employer or claimant.
(d) The total amount of collectible penalties and interest
still owed to this state by employer or claimant.
(e) The number of fraudulent and noncompliant cases that have
been appealed by an employer or claimant during the quarter.
Sec. 804. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for
unemployment insurance agency must be used to staff unemployment
insurance agency branch offices for in-person appointments for
unemployment insurance agency claimant services.
(2) The department shall provide a biannual report to the
standard report recipients not later than March 15 and September 30
that includes all of the following:
(a) The number and location of in-person offices.
(b) The average number of staff at each location over the
previous 6 months.
(c) The volume of in-person claimants served at each location
in the previous 6 months.
(d) For the previous 6 months, the average number of staff at
each location where the unemployment insurance agency offers in-
person appointments, the average number of staff assigned to
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


offering virtual appointments, and the average number of staff
assigned to offering telephone appointments.
(e) For the previous 6 months, the volume of in-person
claimants served at each location, the volume of claimants served
through virtual appointments, and the volume of claimants served
through telephone appointments.
Sec. 805. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for the
unemployment insurance agency may be used by the unemployment
insurance agency to increase capacity by an estimated 250 limited-
term employees only if the unemployment insurance agency provides
full-time, in-person services at existing unemployment insurance
local offices.
(2) In addition to the 250 limited-term employees described in
subsection (1), the unemployment insurance agency may increase
capacity by up to 250 additional limited-term employees if all of
the following occur:
(a) The unemployment insurance agency provides full-time, in-
person services at existing unemployment insurance local offices.
(b) The number of claims received by the unemployment
insurance agency increased by 20% or more in a month.
(c) The unemployment insurance agency determines there is a
need for additional limited-term employees.
Sec. 806. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
unemployment insurance agency, the department shall maintain
customer service standards for employers and claimants making use
of the various means by which they can access the system.
(2) The department shall identify specific outcomes and
performance metrics for this initiative, including, but not limited
to, the following:
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(a) Unemployment benefit fund balance.
(b) Process improvement - fiscal integrity.
(c) Process improvement - determination timeliness.
(d) Process improvement - determination quality.
Sec. 807. Funds earned or authorized by the USDOL in addition
to the appropriation in part 1 for the unemployment insurance
agency are appropriated and may be expended for staffing and
related expenses incurred in the operation of its programs. These
funds may be spent after the department notifies the standard
report recipients of the purpose and amount of each grant award.

REHABILITATION SERVICES
Sec. 901. The Michigan rehabilitation services and bureau of
services for blind persons shall work collaboratively with service
organizations and government entities to identify allowable match
dollars to secure available federal vocational rehabilitation
funds.
Sec. 902. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall provide an annual report on efforts taken to
improve the Michigan rehabilitation services not later than March
15 to the standard report recipients. The report must include all
of the following items:
(a) Changes in administrative costs and staffing.
(b) Number of individuals with disabilities served each fiscal
year and number of students with disabilities served each fiscal
year.
(c) Number of services provided in each allowable vocational
rehabilitation service category.
(d) Plans to integrate Michigan rehabilitative services
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


programs into other services provided by the department.
(e) Quarterly expenditures by major spending category.
(f) Employment and job retention rates from both Michigan
rehabilitation services and its nonprofit partners.
(g) Success rate of each district in achieving the program
goals by geographic region, determined in a manner determined by
the department.
(h) An explanation of each program goal that is set for
Michigan rehabilitation services.
Sec. 903. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
Michigan rehabilitation services, the department shall allocate
funding along with available federal match to support the provision
of vocational rehabilitation services to eligible agricultural
workers with disabilities. Authorized services shall assist
agricultural workers with disabilities in acquiring or maintaining
quality employment and independence.
(2) Not later than March 15, the department shall report to
the standard report recipients on the total number of clients
served and the total amount of federal matching funds obtained
throughout the duration of the program.
Sec. 904. If the department is at risk of entering into an
order of selection for services, the department shall notify the
standard report recipients within 2 weeks of receiving
notification.
Sec. 905. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for independent
living must be used to support the general operations of centers
for independent living in delivering mandated independent living
services in compliance with federal rules and regulations,
including 2 CFR 200, for the centers, by existing centers for
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


independent living to serve underserved areas, and for projects to
build the capacity of centers for independent living to deliver
independent living services. Applications for the funds must be
reviewed in accordance with criteria and procedures established by
the department. Funds must be used in a manner consistent with the
state plan for independent living. Services provided should assist
people with disabilities to move toward self-sufficiency,
including, but not limited to, support for accessing transportation
and health care, obtaining employment, community living, nursing
home transition, information and referral services, education,
youth transition services, veterans, and stigma reduction
activities and community education. This includes the independent
living guide services that specifically focus on economic self-
sufficiency.
(2) Not later than March 15 and in partnership with service
providers, the department shall provide a report to the standard
report recipients on direct customer and system outcomes and
performance measures.
Sec. 906. Federal workforce innovation and opportunity
vocational rehabilitation funds from prior years that are received
in amounts in addition to those included in part 1 and that have
already met state matching requirements are appropriated for the
purposes intended. The department may carry forward into the
succeeding fiscal year unexpended federal workforce innovation and
opportunity vocational rehabilitation funds that do not require
additional state matching funds.
Sec. 907. (1) The appropriation in part 1 for bureau of
services for blind persons includes funds for case services. These
funds may be used for tuition payments for blind clients.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(2) Revenue collected by the bureau of services for blind
persons and from private and local sources that is unexpended at
the end of the fiscal year must carry forward to the subsequent
fiscal year.
Sec. 908. The bureau of services for blind persons may provide
and enter into agreements to provide general services, training,
meetings, information, special equipment, software, facility use,
and technical consulting services to other principal executive
departments, state agencies, local units of government, the
judicial branch of government, other organizations, and patrons of
department facilities. The department may charge fees for these
services that are reasonably related to the cost of providing the
services. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, funds
collected by the department for these services are appropriated for
all expenses necessary. The funds appropriated under this section
are allotted for expenditure when they are received by the
department of treasury.
Sec. 909. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for a regional
or subregional library must not be released until a budget for that
regional or subregional library has been approved by the department
for expenditures for library services directly serving the blind
and persons with disabilities.
(2) To receive subregional state aid appropriated in part 1, a
regional or subregional library's fiscal agency must agree to
maintain local funding support at the same level in the current
fiscal year as in the fiscal agency's preceding fiscal year. If a
reduction in expenditures equally affects all agencies in a local
unit of government that includes the regional or subregional
library's fiscal agency, the reduction must not be interpreted as a
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


reduction in local support and must not disqualify a regional or
subregional library from receiving state aid under part 1. If a
reduction in income affects a library cooperative or district
library that includes a regional or subregional library's fiscal
agency or a reduction in expenditures for the regional or
subregional library's fiscal agency, a reduction in expenditures
for the regional or subregional library must not be interpreted as
a reduction in local support and must not disqualify a regional or
subregional library from receiving state aid under part 1.

COMMISSIONS
Sec. 951. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the office of
global Michigan is to coordinate with any affiliated commissions
established in statute or by executive order to produce a report by
January 31. The report must be submitted to the standard report
recipients and must include, but is not limited to, all of the
following:
(a) A description of the activities that the commissions
initiated to promote cooperation between the commissions to promote
the commissions' purpose.
(b) A list of all grant recipients.
(c) The amount each grant recipient received.
(d) Any grants awarded that relate to the mission statement
and the goals of those grants.
Sec. 953. The office of global Michigan must submit a report
to the standard report recipients not later than January 31. The
report must include all of the following information:
(a) A list of major programs and activities.
(b) The number of refugee arrivals, the job placement rate of
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


those refugees actively receiving services under global Michigan
grants, and the average wages and initial job placements for those
refugees.
(c) A list and description of the activities that the office
has conducted to attract and retain international, advanced degree,
and entrepreneurial talent.
(d) A list of goals for the office and the metrics used to
determine whether each goal is achieved.
(e) A list of all grant recipients.
(f) The amount each grant recipient received.
(g) Any grants awarded that relate to the mission statement
and the goals of those grants.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1000. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
business attraction, community revitalization, and entrepreneurial
ecosystem, not less than 25% must be used to award grants to small
business support hubs and community incubators with the goal of
increasing local economic development and community development.
Grants may be used for the establishment, expansion, or operation
of small business support hubs or community incubators that promote
innovation and entrepreneurship, foster local growth, increase
access to economic resources, or provide mentorship, training,
integrated supports, technical assistance, or networking
opportunities. Grantees must be selected with preference to hubs
located in geographically diverse areas that promote innovation and
entrepreneurship in this state. Of the total amount allocated in
this subsection, 15% must be awarded to hubs that connect global
markets to Michigan entrepreneurs or small businesses.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for business
attraction, community revitalization, and entrepreneurial
ecosystem, not less than 5% must be used for community development
financial institutions fund grants in accordance with section 1001.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for business
attraction, community revitalization, and entrepreneurial
ecosystem, not less than 40% must be used for business attraction
and community revitalization. Funds allocated under this subsection
may be used to support programs and administration as outlined in
the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2001 to
125.2094. Priority must be given to low-income communities, low-
employment communities, or communities with higher needs.
(4) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for business
attraction, community revitalization, and entrepreneurial
ecosystem, not less than 30% must be used to provide support for
small businesses and may include the following activities:
(a) Small business support hubs and community incubators.
(b) Business development grants or loans to small businesses.
(c) Support to community development financial institutions.
(d) The public spaces, community places program.
(e) Grants and loans to small business service providers.
(f) Grants or other funding for technical assistance for small
businesses.
(g) Matching funds for federal grants and programming that
benefit small businesses.
Sec. 1001. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for business
attraction, community revitalization, and entrepreneurial ecosystem
and distributed to community development financial institutions
fund grants are transferred to the Michigan community development
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


financial institutions fund created under this section. The
Michigan community development financial institutions fund is
created in the state treasury. All funds in the Michigan community
development financial institutions fund, including funds
unallocated from prior years, are appropriated for grants to
eligible community development financial institutions under this
section and related expenditures permitted under this section. The
legislature finds and declares that the appropriation described in
this section is for a public purpose, including promoting community
economic revitalization and community development through community
development financial institutions.
(2) The Michigan strategic fund shall develop a grant
application consistent with this section that is published and
available on its publicly accessible website. The plan must include
prioritization of community development financial institutions that
are majority owned by, or serving a majority of, underserved or
underrepresented populations.
(3) The application required under subsection (2) must include
all of the following:
(a) The name of the community development financial
institution applying for a grant from the CDFI fund.
(b) The location of the principal office of the applicant.
(c) Documentation indicating whether the applicant is a
Michigan CDFI or a multistate CDFI.
(d) An indication of whether the applicant is or is not a
depository institution.
(e) The amount of the grant sought, not exceeding the maximum
eligible amount of the grant under subsections (4) to (6).
(f) If the community development financial institution is a
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


depository institution, the net assets of the depository
institution.
(g) If the community development financial institution is not
a depository institution, the amount of qualifying commitments made
by the community development financial institution during the 3
applicant fiscal years preceding the fiscal year in which the
application is submitted.
(h) A description of the amount an applicant is eligible to
apply for under subsections (4) to (6).
(i) A description of the proposed use of the grant award by
the applicant for eligible activities consistent with the
requirements of this section, the community development banking and
financial institutions act of 1994, and any other requirements
applicable under federal law.
(j) Documentation of the applicant's certification as a
community development financial institution that meets the
eligibility requirements under 12 CFR 1805.201 by the federal fund.
The documentation required by this subdivision may include the list
of community development financial institutions in good standing
maintained and published by the federal fund.
(k) A statement that the applicant is in compliance with all
requirements applicable to the applicant under the community
development banking and financial institutions act of 1994.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (9), a community
development financial institution that is a depository institution
is eligible for 1 or more grant awards in the following amount for
each grant:
(a) Up to $1,000,000.00 if the depository institution has
total net assets of less than $500,000,000.00.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(b) Up to $1,500,000.00 if the depository institution has
total net assets of $500,000,000.00 to $999,999,999.99.
(c) Up to $2,000,000.00 if the depository institution has
total net assets of $1,000,000,000.00 to $1,999,999,999.99.
(d) Up to $2,500,000.00 if the depository institution has
total net assets of $2,000,000,000.00 or more.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (9), a
community development financial institution that is not a
depository institution is eligible for 1 or more grant awards in
the following amount for each grant:
(a) Up to $500,000.00 if the community development financial
institution made qualifying commitments in an amount that averaged
less than $1,000,000.00 per applicant fiscal year during the 3
fiscal years preceding the fiscal year in which an application for
a grant is submitted.
(b) Up to $1,500,000.00 if the community development financial
institution made qualifying commitments in an amount that averaged
from $1,000,000.00 to $3,999,999.99 per applicant fiscal year
during the 3 fiscal years preceding the fiscal year in which an
application for a grant is submitted.
(c) Up to $2,500,000.00 if the community development financial
institution made qualifying commitments in an amount that averaged
from $4,000,000.00 to $5,999,999.99 per applicant fiscal year
during the 3 fiscal years preceding the fiscal year in which an
application for a grant is submitted.
(d) Up to $3,500,000.00 if the community development financial
institution made qualifying commitments in an amount that averaged
from $6,000,000.00 to $9,999,999.99 per applicant fiscal year
during the 3 fiscal years preceding the fiscal year in which an
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


application for a grant is submitted.
(e) Up to $4,000,000.00 if the community development financial
institution made qualifying commitments in an amount that averaged
at least $10,000,000.00 per applicant fiscal year during the 3
fiscal years preceding the fiscal year in which an application for
a grant is submitted.
(6) A single grant awarded to a multistate CDFI that is not a
depository institution under subsection (5) must not exceed
$2,500,000.00.
(7) The Michigan strategic fund shall accept initial
applications for a grant under this section until November 30,
2026, and applications for a second round of grants under this
section by June 1, 2027. The MSF also may accept applications for
additional rounds of grants after June 1, 2027. The Michigan
strategic fund shall approve or deny a grant application within 49
days after the receipt of an administratively complete application
as determined by the Michigan strategic fund. If the application
complies with the requirements of this section, the Michigan
strategic fund shall approve the award of the grant in the amount
requested by the applicant. The Michigan strategic fund may deny a
grant application submitted under this section only for the
following reasons:
(a) The applicant does not satisfy all of the requirements
under this section.
(b) Subject to subsection (9), there is insufficient money in
the CDFI fund to pay the grant amount requested.
(c) The applicant is not in compliance with applicable
requirements under the community development banking and financial
institutions act of 1994.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(8) If the Michigan strategic fund denies an application under
subsection (7), the applicant may provide additional information to
the Michigan strategic fund within 7 days after the notice of
denial. The Michigan strategic fund shall review and reconsider the
application and additional information within 28 days after the
applicant provides additional information.
(9) If there is an insufficient amount of money in the CDFI
fund to pay the grants approved for a round of grant applications,
the amount of each grant for that round shall be reduced
proportionately by the Michigan strategic fund based upon the
amount of money available in the CDFI fund. If the amount of money
available to pay grants approved for a round of grant applications
exceeds the amount needed to pay the grant awards, the Michigan
strategic fund may increase each grant awarded in that round in an
amount proportionate to the total of all grant awards for that
round or make the excess money available in a subsequent round of
grant applications and awards.
(10) On approval of an application, the Michigan strategic
fund and the applicant shall sign a written grant agreement
providing the terms of the grant agreement. A grant agreement must
include all of the following:
(a) A requirement that at least 80% of the grant award be used
for financial products and financial services or expenditures of
money or commitments to expend money to reduce the interest rate
otherwise applicable under a loan agreement or funding agreement.
(b) A restriction that no more than 10% of the grant award be
used for technical assistance activities described in 12 CFR
1805.303.
(c) A restriction that no more than 10% of the grant award be
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


used for administration and operations.
(d) A requirement that a grant award be committed under a loan
agreement or funding agreement or disbursed by the recipient within
3 years after the date that the recipient receives the grant award.
(e) A requirement that the entire amount of the grant award be
expended within this state.
(f) A requirement that the grant award recipient comply with
all requirements applicable under the community development banking
and financial institutions act of 1994 while the agreement is in
effect.
(g) Provisions authorizing the Michigan strategic fund to
enforce the terms of the grant agreement, including a requirement
that a noncompliant recipient of a grant award may be required to
repay the portion of the award not committed by the recipient
pursuant to a permitted loan, program, or agreement. Money repaid
under this subdivision must be deposited in the CDFI fund.
(h) A requirement for the grant award recipient to report on
activities consistent with the requirements of subsection (14).
(i) If the grant agreement includes a grant of federal money,
the grant agreement must require the recipient to comply with any
requirements applicable to the use of the federal money.
(11) A grant agreement may provide for the community
development financial institution that is the recipient of a grant
award to serve as an intermediary lender to another community
development financial institution consistent with the purposes of
this section if not prohibited by federal law applicable to the
expenditure of any federal grant money.
(12) If not prohibited by federal law applicable to the
expenditure of any federal grant money, a grant agreement must
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


permit a grant award recipient to assign the award to an affiliate
and for the affiliate to assume the obligations of the grant award
recipient if the affiliate satisfies all of the following:
(a) Is a community development financial institution.
(b) Is organized in the same manner as the grant award
recipient.
(c) Is controlled by the grant award recipient in 1 or both of
the following ways:
(i) The grant award recipient owns a majority of the stock of
the affiliate.
(ii) A majority of the members of the board of the affiliate
also are members of the board of the grant award recipient.
(13) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (14), the
Michigan strategic fund shall require the recipient of a grant
award under this section to report annually to the Michigan
strategic fund regarding its activities under this section
beginning on the May 1 following the applicant fiscal year in which
the grant award was received by the recipient. The Michigan
strategic fund shall publish on its website a standard form for the
report. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (14), the report
must include all of the following information:
(a) A copy of the recipient's most recent confirmation of
recertification as a community development financial institution
issued by the community development financial institutions fund
under 12 CFR 1805.201, which may include the list of community
development financial institutions in good standing maintained and
published by the federal fund.
(b) A list of financial products and services provided during
the prior applicant fiscal year that includes all of the following:
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(i) The name of each transaction.
(ii) A transition tracking number for each transaction.
(iii) The date of each transaction.
(iv) The amount of each transaction.
(v) The total project cost for each transaction if other
funding was involved.
(vi) The physical address of the borrower or customer for each
transaction.
(vii) The census tract of the borrower or customer for each
transaction.
(viii) An indication of whether the census tract in which the
transaction is located is an eligible investment area.
(ix) A description of the projected economic impact of the
transaction.
(x) A description of any financial products or financial
services provided.
(c) A description of technical assistance provided during the
prior applicant fiscal year.
(d) A summary of expenditures for administration and
operations provided during the prior applicant fiscal year that
includes all of the following:
(i) A description of administration and operations costs
incurred.
(ii) Professional fees and expenses incurred.
(iii) A summary of any other eligible expenses for
administration and operation.
(14) A grant award recipient is not required to provide a
report under this section for any applicant fiscal year in which it
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


did not loan or otherwise commit or disburse grant award money. The
Michigan strategic fund shall not include information in the report
required under subsection (13) if information that otherwise would
be included in a report under subsection (13) is either of the
following:
(a) Exempt from disclosure or confidential as proprietary
business or financial information under the community development
banking and financial institutions act of 1994.
(b) Exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information
act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246.
(15) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the
Michigan strategic fund may expend up to 4% of the appropriation
provided from the CDFI fund for the costs it incurs in
administering the programs and activities in this section.
(16) Unexpended funds appropriated for community development
financial institutions fund grants are designated as a work project
appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at
the end of the fiscal year and must be available for grant awards
or other expenditures until the project has been completed. The
following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to provide grants to
eligible community development financial institutions under this
section.
(b) All grants will be distributed in accordance with this
section and the grant guidelines as part of the application process
and grant agreements between the Michigan strategic fund and grant
recipients.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $10,000,000.00.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2028.
(17) As used in this section:
(a) "CDFI fund" means the Michigan community development
financial institutions fund created in subsection (1).
(b) "Community development banking and financial institutions
act of 1994" means subtitle A of the Riegle community development
and regulatory improvement act of 1994, 12 USC 4701 to 4719.
(c) "Community development financial institution" means that
term as defined in section 103 of the community development banking
and financial institutions act of 1994, 12 USC 4702, but is limited
to a community development financial institution that satisfies all
of the following:
(i) Is an entity that meets the eligibility requirements
described in 12 CFR 1805.200.
(ii) Is certified as a community development financial
institution that meets the eligibility requirements under 12 CFR
1805.201, by the federal fund.
(iii) Maintains 1 or more physical offices within this state.
(iv) Employs 2 or more individuals at a physical office within
this state, including employees of an affiliate of the community
development financial institution that provides services to the
community development financial institution.
(v) Is a Michigan CDFI or a multistate CDFI.
(d) "Depository institution" means any of the following:
(i) A bank as that term is defined in section 3(a) of the
federal deposit insurance act, 12 USC 1813.
(ii) A savings association as that term is defined in section
3(b) of the federal deposit insurance act, 12 USC 1813.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


(iii) A credit union as that term is defined in section 102 of
the credit union act, 2003 PA 215, MCL 490.102.
(iv) A depository institution holding company as that term is
defined in 12 CFR 1805.104.
(e) "Eligible activities" means activities described in 12 CFR
1805.301, and includes credit enhancements, loan loss reserves,
equity investments, expenditures of money or commitments to expend
money to reduce the interest rate otherwise applicable under a loan
agreement or funding agreement, and grants related to these
activities.
(f) "Federal fund" means the community development financial
institutions fund established under section 104 of the community
development banking and financial institutions act of 1994, 12 USC
4703, and moved within the United States Department of Treasury by
the emergency supplemental appropriations for additional disaster
assistance, for anti-terrorism initiatives, for assistance in the
recovery from the tragedy that occurred at Oklahoma City, and
rescissions act, 1995, Public Law 104-19, and by Public Law 104-
134.
(g) "Financial products" means that term as defined in 12 CFR
1805.104.
(h) "Financial services" means that term as defined in 12 CFR
1805.104.
(i) "Michigan CDFI" means a community development financial
institution that satisfies all of the following:
(i) Is certified as a community development financial
institution that meets the eligibility requirements under 12 CFR
1805.201, by the federal fund.
(ii) Is headquartered at an address in this state, as
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


recognized by the federal fund.
(iii) Has a target market that includes this state, as
recognized by the federal fund.
(iv) Serves 1 or more targeted populations located within this
state.
(j) "Multistate CDFI" means a community development financial
institution that is not a Michigan CDFI but is a community
development financial institution that committed under a loan
agreement or other funding agreement at least $10,000,000.00 in
financial products and financial services to a target market within
this state under the community development banking and financial
institutions act of 1994 during the 5 applicant fiscal years
preceding the applicant in the current fiscal year in which an
application for a grant is submitted.
(k) "Qualifying commitment" means funding committed by a
community development financial institution under a loan agreement
or other funding agreement in target markets or targeted
populations in this state that is either of the following:
(i) Financial products or financial services committed under
the community development banking and financial institutions act of
1994.
(ii) An additional credit enhancement, loan loss reserve, or
equity investment committed by the community development financial
institution or an affiliate of the community development financial
institution.
(l) "Target market" means that term as defined in 12 CFR
1805.104.
(m) "Targeted population" means that term as defined in 12 CFR
1805.104.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Sec. 1002. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
museums support, $500,000.00 must directly be awarded to support
the Arab American National Museum.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for museums support,
$500,000.00 must directly be awarded to the Charles H. Wright
Museum of African American History.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for museums support,
$500,000.00 must directly be awarded to support the Zekelman
Holocaust Center.
Sec. 1003. The department shall operate a grant program to
provide money to public broadcast stations. To apply for a grant, a
public broadcast station must submit an application the department,
on a form and in a manner as prescribed by the director.
Eligibility must be determined using the following requirements:
(a) The public broadcast station provides programming that
serves educational, cultural, civic, or informational needs of
communities in this state.
(b) The public broadcast station demonstrates a commitment to
broad public access, noncommercial operation, editorial
independence, and a mission aligned with public interest
broadcasting.
(c) The public broadcast station's proposed use of the grant
money is reasonably related to sustaining or expanding services
that meet public media needs, including, but not limited to,
programming, staffing, technical infrastructure, or advertising and
outreach.
Sec. 1004. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for special events
and national convention attraction must be used by the Michigan
strategic fund to promote this state as a destination for special
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


events, including, but not limited to, national conventions,
national conferences, major sporting events, or other significant
events that would feature Michigan to a national audience.
(2) The Michigan strategic fund must develop program
guidelines for the use of these funds. Funds may be used to help
attract eligible special events and to support costs associated
with hosting eligible events. Eligible events must have a regular
attendance of more than 500 people and meet other eligibility
criteria as determined by the Michigan strategic fund.
(3) Unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for special events
and national convention attraction are designated as a work project
appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not
lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for
expenditure for projects under this section until the projects have
been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to promote this state as a
destination for special events and support costs related to hosting
eligible events.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $6,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Sec. 1005. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for talent
partnership must be used to administer a grant program to support
implementation of transformational community development
initiatives.
(2) Talent partnership grant funding must be used to implement
transformational public space development projects in central city
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


neighborhoods or concentrated districts and leverage
interdepartmental and cross-sector coordination through local
talent plans that are designed to increase this state's population
of young talent by creating high-density, high-amenity, walkable,
vibrant-street-life neighborhoods or districts and to create
business ownership opportunities for local residents. Qualified
plan proposals must include all of the following:
(a) The transition of roadway usage from cars to alternative
transportation spaces, including, but not limited to, walking,
biking, and transit.
(b) Commercial corridor activation, including innovations to
fill vacant retail space with locally owned businesses.
(c) Mixed-use development that contributes to dense, walkable
areas.
(d) A plan to do all of the following:
(i) Support greater density.
(ii) Increase access to affordable or middle-income housing.
(iii) Improve direct access to multimodal transportation.
(iv) Improve quality of life through increased parks, green
spaces, outdoor recreation, and arts and cultural amenities.
(3) The legislature finds and declares that the appropriation
described in this section is for a public purpose and serves the
health, safety, and general welfare of the residents of this state.
(4) The department may do any of the following to implement
the grant program:
(a) Develop guidelines to accept and review local talent plans
from eligible applicants and award funding for approved local
talent plans to increase this state's population of young talent by
creating high-density, high-amenity, walkable, vibrant-street-life
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


neighborhoods or districts and to create business ownership
opportunities for local residents.
(b) Consult with local stakeholders, provide education and
consultation to the public during the application process, and
regularly monitor implementation progress of approved local talent
plans.
(c) Review existing best practices for similar programs and
consult with third-party experts, including academic and research
institutions based in this state.
(d) Lead a multiagency coordination effort to leverage all
available resources that will maximize the effectiveness of the
initiative. As necessary, the department may establish memoranda of
understanding with other state agencies or establish a committee of
state agency representatives to support the initiative.
(5) The department shall allocate funding for the grant
program through the development and submission of local talent
plans from eligible applicants that use a blend of layered,
multifaceted activities described in subsection (7) to meet the
goals of this section.
(6) Eligible applicants for a grant must be a consortium of
entities that may include local governments, local economic
development organizations, the nonprofit community, and the
business community. Consortium applicants must appoint a lead
applicant, which may be 1 of the consortium's entities or a
nonprofit organization, to serve as fiduciary and project manager
for the consortium. An eligible applicant may partner with other
government agencies, consortiums, authorities, and community
anchors or nonprofit entities to submit a local talent plan to the
department and implement an approved local talent plan.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


Notwithstanding local talent plan revisions or subsequent funding
rounds, an eligible applicant shall not submit more than 1 local
talent plan. Only grant applicants that provide a minimum of 50%
local or private match funds may be considered for a grant under
this section.
(7) Approved local talent plans must include at least 1 of the
following eligible activities to meet the objectives of the grant
program:
(a) Planning, engineering, permitting review, and other local
assessments to support implementation of a local talent plan.
(b) Demonstrated community engagement, stakeholder support, or
commitment to the local talent plan. As applicable, stakeholders
may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:
(i) Neighborhood associations.
(ii) City councils, planning committees, or other local
government agencies, including public safety agencies.
(iii) Economic development organizations or local businesses or
business organizations.
(iv) Local anchor institutions.
(v) Local nonprofits, foundations, or community organizations.
(vi) Regional planning organizations or consortiums.
(vii) Public transit organizations.
(viii) Faith-based organizations.
(ix) Tribal governments.
(c) Plans for the redevelopment of existing housing stock.
(d) Plans to improve utilization of mixed-use and commercial
property, including, but not limited to, the conversion of
commercial space for affordable housing.
(e) Road repairs and other surface improvements that will
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp


increase walkability, access to green space, dedicated nonmotorized
transportation, and access to rapid transit or high-speed rail.
(f) Supports for small businesses and emerging entrepreneurs,
including access to credit and professional development.
(g) Plans to enhance parks, green space, community recreation,
promotion of local artists or art installations, and outdoor social
spaces.
(h) Activities to pursue other sources of funding to directly
support a local talent plan, including other governmental funds or
private resources.
(8) In addition to the eligible activities under subsection
(7), approved local talent plans must include all of the following:
(a) A defined area, such as a neighborhood, district, or
corridor, in which a local talent plan will be implemented. Unless
identified as a supporting part of an approved talent plan, funds
allocated to approved plans must be used only within the plan's
defined area.
(b) A description of how local talent plan activities directly
support the objectives under subsection (2).
(c) A description of how funds appropriated under part 1 for
talent partnership will be used and any other funds or resources
that will be provided to ensure a plan meets all the objectives
under subsection (2).
(d) Identification of stakeholders that were engaged in the
development and are committed to the implementation of a local
talent plan.
(e) In addition to any state or federal resources,
identification of local or private match funds or resources that
will be committed.
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp

100
(f) A proposed implementation timeline and demonstration of a
local talent plan's sustainability after any state or federal funds
are exhausted.
(g) Identifiable goals and measurable outcomes to be used to
monitor progress.
(9) To leverage existing programs and resources to support
talent concentration, the department may establish a state agency
workgroup to support the implementation of this section, including
from agencies that oversee any programs related to housing, home
repairs, blight elimination, business supports, community
development, transportation or mobility, arts, and outdoor
recreation.
(10) The department may retain up to 3% of funds under this
section for implementation costs. In addition, the department may
retain up to an additional 2% of funds under this section to
reimburse other state agencies' activities that are in support of a
talent partnership project. The department may contract with at
least 1 consultant that is a nonprofit research organization or
public education institution based in this state with experience in
at least placemaking research to support this section.
(11) The department shall post online the guidelines for local
talent plans and identify available research or resources that may
be used to support the development of a local talent plan.
(12) In evaluating each application, subject to subsection
(13), the department shall use objective criteria, including, but
not limited to, the comprehensive nature of the local talent plan,
the local support identified, long-term sustainability, and the
likelihood to achieve the goals of the talent partnership program.
The department must consider, but is not limited to, all of the
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp

101
following when selecting grant recipients:
(a) The extent to which a proposed local talent plan will
support the creation and ongoing success of locally owned
businesses.
(b) The extent to which a proposed local talent plan will
create dense, walkable, vibrant spaces.
(c) The extent to which zoning and code restrictions have
been, or will need to be, modified to support high-density
residential development.
(d) The extent to which the proposed local talent plan
supports facilities and walkways that house or present cultural
arts programs, performances, and exhibitions.
(e) The extent to which the proposed local talent plan
provides mixed-income housing.
(f) The likelihood of successful implementation of a proposed
plan and its sustainability.
(13) The department shall award funds consistent with the
following:
(a) Grants must be awarded in a geographically diverse manner.
(b) Subject to the department's approval, the grant program
permits grant awards to continue implementation of existing talent
plans.
(14) The department shall publish approved local talent plans
and funding allocations under this section on the department's
website. The department may approve subsequent rounds of funding
for local talent plans if either additional funds become available
or there are remaining funds from the appropriation under part 1
for talent partnerships. Remaining funds must be awarded in
accordance with this section and, as necessary, prorated based on
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp

102
availability of funds.
(15) The department shall ensure grant agreements with
applicants include regular progress reports and clawback provisions
to verify that all expenditures are made in accordance with an
approved local talent plan. Applicants receiving funds under this
section shall respond to all reasonable information requests from
the department related to the funds received under this section.
(16) The department shall provide an annual report by
September 30 to the standard report recipients on the
implementation of this program, including, but not limited to, all
of the following:
(a) The utilization of funds allocated under this section,
including the amount and status of any funds allocated for approved
local talent plans and the amount retained by the department or
state agencies to support implementation of this section.
(b) As applicable, identification of activities undertaken by
agency workgroup participants to communicate the implementation of
local talent plans to each of their respective agencies and
identification of any existing programs or resources that may be
used to support the implementation of a local talent plan.
(17) The unexpended portion of grants under this section is
designated as a work project appropriation in accordance with
section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1451a. Unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the
end of the fiscal year and must be available for grant awards or
other expenditures under this section until the project has been
completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to support transformational
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp

103
placemaking investments and leverage intergovernmental coordination
to increase this state's population of young talent by creating
high-density, high-amenity, walkable, and vibrant-street-life
neighborhoods or districts and to create business ownership
opportunities for local residents.
(b) All grants must be distributed in accordance with this
section and the grant guidelines as part of the application process
and grant agreements between the department and grant recipients.
(c) The estimated cost of the work project is $5,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2030.
Final Page
GSS S06111'26 (S-1) iwegzp